Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.090

College board—Powers and duties.

The college board shall have general supervision and control over the state system of community and technical colleges. In addition to the other powers and duties imposed upon the college board by this chapter, the college board shall be charged with the following powers, duties and responsibilities:

(1) Review the budgets prepared by the boards of trustees, prepare a single budget for the support of the state system of community and technical colleges and adult education, and submit this budget to the governor as provided in RCW 43.88.090;

(2) Establish guidelines for the disbursement of funds; and receive and disburse such funds for adult education and maintenance and operation and capital support of the college districts in conformance with the state and district budgets, and in conformance with chapter 43.88 RCW;

(3) Ensure, through the full use of its authority:

(a) That each college district, in coordination with colleges, within a regional area, shall offer thoroughly comprehensive educational, training, and service programs to meet the needs of both the communities and students served by combining high standards of excellence in academic transfer courses; realistic and practical courses in occupational education, both graded and ungraded; and community services of an educational, cultural, and recreational nature; and adult education, including basic skills and general, family, and workforce literacy programs and services;

(b) That each college district shall maintain an open-door policy, to the end that no student will be denied admission because of the location of the student's residence or because of the student's educational background or ability; that, insofar as is practical in the judgment of the college board, curriculum offerings will be provided to meet the educational and training needs of the community generally and the students thereof; and that all students, regardless of their differing courses of study, will be considered, known and recognized equally as members of the student body: PROVIDED, That the administrative officers of a community or technical college may deny admission to a prospective student or attendance to an enrolled student if, in their judgment, the student would not be competent to profit from the curriculum offerings of the college, or would, by his or her presence or conduct, create a disruptive atmosphere within the college not consistent with the purposes of the institution. This subsection (3)(b) shall not apply to competency, conduct, or presence associated with a disability in a person twenty-one years of age or younger attending a technical college;

(4) Prepare a comprehensive master plan for the development of community and technical college education and training in the state; and assist the office of financial management in the preparation of enrollment projections to support plans for providing adequate college facilities in all areas of the state. The master plan shall include implementation of the vision, goals, priorities, and strategies in the statewide strategic master plan for higher education under *RCW 28B.76.200 based on the community and technical college system's role and mission. The master plan shall also contain measurable performance indicators and benchmarks for gauging progress toward achieving the goals and priorities;

(5) Define and administer criteria and guidelines for the establishment of new community and technical colleges or campuses within the existing districts;

(6) Establish criteria and procedures for modifying district boundary lines and consolidating district structures to form multiple campus districts consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended and in accordance therewith make such changes as it deems advisable;

(7) Establish minimum standards to govern the operation of the community and technical colleges with respect to:

(a) Qualifications and credentials of instructional and key administrative personnel, except as otherwise provided in the state plan for vocational education;

(b) Internal budgeting, accounting, auditing, and financial procedures as necessary to supplement the general requirements prescribed pursuant to chapter 43.88 RCW;

(c) The content of the curriculums and other educational and training programs, and the requirement for degrees and certificates awarded by the colleges;

(d) Standard admission policies;

(e) Eligibility of courses to receive state fund support; and

(f) Common student identifiers such that once a student has enrolled at any community or technical college he or she retains the same student identification upon transfer to any college district;

(8) Encourage colleges to use multiple measures to determine whether a student must enroll in a precollege course including, but not limited to, placement tests, the SAT, high school transcripts, college transcripts, or initial class performance, and require colleges to post all the available options for course placement on their website and in their admissions materials;

(9) Establish and administer criteria and procedures for all capital construction including the establishment, installation, and expansion of facilities within the various college districts;

(10) Encourage innovation in the development of new educational and training programs and instructional methods; coordinate research efforts to this end; and disseminate the findings thereof;

(11) Exercise any other powers, duties and responsibilities necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

(12) Authorize the various community and technical colleges to offer programs and courses in other districts when it determines that such action is consistent with the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.50.020 as now or hereafter amended;

(13) Notwithstanding any other law or statute regarding the sale of state property, sell or exchange and convey any or all interest in any community and technical college real and personal property, except such property as is received by a college district in accordance with RCW 28B.50.140(8), when it determines that such property is surplus or that such a sale or exchange is in the best interests of the community and technical college system;

(14) In order that the treasurer for the state board for community and technical colleges appointed in accordance with RCW 28B.50.085 may make vendor payments, the state treasurer will honor warrants drawn by the state board providing for an initial advance on July 1, 1982, of the current biennium and on July 1st of each succeeding biennium from the state general fund in an amount equal to twenty-four percent of the average monthly allotment for such budgeted biennium expenditures for the state board for community and technical colleges as certified by the office of financial management; and at the conclusion of such initial month and for each succeeding month of any biennium, the state treasurer will reimburse expenditures incurred and reported monthly by the state board treasurer in accordance with chapter 43.88 RCW: PROVIDED, That the reimbursement to the state board for actual expenditures incurred in the final month of each biennium shall be less the initial advance made in such biennium;

(15) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (13) of this section, may receive such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises, and bequests of real or personal property from private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, whenever the terms and conditions thereof will aid in carrying out the community and technical college programs and may sell, lease or exchange, invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to the terms and conditions thereof; and adopt regulations to govern the receipt and expenditure of the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof; and

(16) The college board shall have the power of eminent domain.

[ 2013 c 57 s 1; 2011 c 109 s 1; 2010 c 246 s 3; 2009 c 64 s 4; 2004 c 275 s 57; 2003 c 130 s 6; 1991 c 238 s 33; 1982 c 50 s 1; 1981 c 246 s 2; 1979 c 151 s 20; 1977 ex.s. c 282 s 4; 1973 c 62 s 16; 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 21; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.090. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.76.200 was repealed by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 244, effective July 1, 2012.

Findings—Intent—2010 c 246: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Intent—2009 c 64: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Findings—Intent—2003 c 130: See note following RCW 28B.77.070.

Severability—1981 c 246: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 246 s 6.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28B.50.870.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Construction, reconstruction, equipping facilities—Financing: RCW 28B.50.340.

Development of budget: RCW 43.88.090.

Eminent domain: Title 8 RCW.

State budgeting, accounting, and reporting system: Chapter 43.88 RCW.